California statutes. Military and Veterans Code
On the several dates on which funds are remitted pursuant to Section 16676 of the Government Code for the payment of the then maturing principal and interest on the bonds in each fiscal year, there shall be returned into the General Fund in the State Treasury, all of the money in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943, not in excess of the principal of and interest on the said bonds then due and payable, except as hereinafter provided for the prior redemption of said bonds, and, in the event such money so returned on said remittance dates is less than said principal and interest then due and payable, then the balance remaining unpaid shall be returned into
 the General Fund in the State Treasury out of said Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943 as soon thereafter as it shall become available, together with interest thereon from such dates of maturity until so returned at the same rate as borne by said bonds, compounded semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1572.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the June 4, 1968, election.)
-------------------------------------------

996.976.

There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury for the purpose of this article, such an amount as will equal the following:

(a) Such sum annually as will be necessary to pay the principal of and the interest on the bonds issued and sold pursuant to the provisions of this article, as said principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) Such sum as is necessary to carry out the
 provisions of Section 996.977 which sum is appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1572.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the June 4, 1968, election.)
-------------------------------------------

996.977.

For the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this article the Director of Finance may by executive order authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this article. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943. Any moneys made available under this article to the board shall be returned by the board to the General Fund from moneys received from the
 sale of bonds sold for the purpose of carrying out this article, together with interest at the rate of interest fixed in the bonds so sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1572.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the June 4, 1968, election.)
-------------------------------------------

996.978.

Upon request of the Department of Veterans Affairs, supported by a statement of the plans and projects of said department with respect thereto, and approved by the Governor, the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943 shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue any bonds authorized under this article in order to carry such plans and projects into execution, and, if so, the amount of bonds then to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out said plans and projects
 progressively, and it shall not be necessary that all the bonds herein authorized to be issued shall be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1572.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the June 4, 1968, election.)
-------------------------------------------

996.979.

While bonds authorized under this article are outstanding, the Secretary of Veterans Affairs shall cause to be made at the close of each fiscal year, a survey of the financial condition of the Division of Farm and Home Purchases, together with a projection of the division’s operations, that survey to be made by an independent public accountant of recognized standing. The results of the surveys and projections shall be set forth in written reports and the independent public accountant shall forward copies of the reports to the Secretary of Veterans Affairs, the members of the California Veterans Board, or, if that board is redesignated by the Legislature as the California Veterans Advisory Board, the members of the California
 Veterans Advisory Board, the appropriate policy committees dealing with veterans affairs in the Senate and the Assembly, and to the members of the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943. The Division of Farm and Home Purchases shall reimburse the independent public accountant for their services out of any funds that the division may have available on deposit with the Treasurer of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 83.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

996.980.

The committee may authorize the State Treasurer to sell all or any part of the bonds herein authorized at such time or times as may be fixed by the State Treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1572.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the June 4, 1968, election.)
-------------------------------------------

996.981.

Whenever bonds are sold, out of the first money realized from their sale, there shall be redeposited in the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund established by Section 16724.5 of the Government Code such sums as have been expended for the purposes specified in Section 16724.5 of the Government Code, which may be used for the same purpose and repaid in the same manner whenever additional sales are made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1572.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the June 4, 1968, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5k. Veterans Bond Act of 1971 [996.985. - 996.995.]

996.985.

This article may be cited as the Veterans Bond Act of 1971.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1167.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the June 6, 1972, election.)
-------------------------------------------

996.986.

The State General Obligation Bond Law, except as otherwise provided herein, is adopted for the purpose of the issuance, sale, and repayment of, and otherwise providing with respect to, the bonds authorized to be issued by this article, and the provisions of that law are included in this article as though set out in full in this article. All references in this article to “herein” shall be deemed to refer both to this article and such law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1167.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the June 6, 1972, election.)
-------------------------------------------

996.987.

As used in this article and for the purposes of this article as used in the State General Obligation Bond Law, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720), Part 3, Division 4, Title 2 of the Government Code, the following words shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Bond” means veterans bond, a state general obligation bond issued pursuant to this article adopting the provisions of the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(b) “Committee” means the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943, created by Section 991.

(c) “Board” means the Department of Veterans Affairs.

(d) “Fund” means the Veterans Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943 created by Section 988.

(e) “Bond Act” means this article authorizing the issuance of State General Obligation Bonds and adopting Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720), Part 3, Division 4, Title 2 of the Government Code by reference.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1167.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the June 6, 1972, election.)
-------------------------------------------

996.988.

For the purpose of creating a fund to provide farm and home aid for veterans in accordance with the provisions of the Veterans Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1943 and of all acts amendatory thereof and supplemental thereto, the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943, created by Section 991, shall be and it hereby is authorized and empowered to create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California, in the aggregate amount of two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000), in the manner provided herein, but not
 otherwise, nor in excess thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1167.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the June 6, 1972, election.)
-------------------------------------------

996.989.

All bonds herein authorized, which shall have been duly sold and delivered as herein provided, shall constitute valid and legally binding general obligations of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest thereof.

There shall be collected annually in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected such a sum, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, as
 shall be required to pay the principal and interest on said bonds as herein provided, and it is hereby made the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collections of said revenue, to do and perform each and every act which shall be necessary to collect such additional sum.

On the several dates on which funds are remitted pursuant to Section 16676 of the Government Code for the payment of the then maturing principal and interest on the bonds in each fiscal year, there shall be returned into the General Fund in the State Treasury, all of the money in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943, not in excess of the principal of and interest on the said bonds then due and payable, except as hereinafter provided for the prior redemption of said bonds, and, in the event such money so returned on said remittance dates is less than said principal and interest then due and payable, then the balance remaining unpaid shall be returned into
 the General Fund in the State Treasury out of said Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943 as soon thereafter as it shall become available, together with interest thereon from such dates of maturity until so returned at the same rate as borne by said bonds, compounded semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1167.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the June 6, 1972, election.)
-------------------------------------------

996.990.

There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury for the purpose of this article, such an amount as will equal the following:

(a) Such sum annually as will be necessary to pay the principal of and the interest on the bonds issued and sold pursuant to the provisions of this article, as said principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) Such sum as is necessary to carry out the
 provisions of Section 996.991, which sum is appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1167.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the June 6, 1972, election.)
-------------------------------------------

996.991.

For the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this article the Director of Finance may by executive order authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this article. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943. Any moneys made available under this article to the board shall be returned by the board to the General Fund from moneys received from the
 sale of bonds sold for the purpose of carrying out this article, together with interest at the rate of interest fixed in the bonds so sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1167.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the June 6, 1972, election.)
-------------------------------------------

996.992.

Upon request of the Department of Veterans Affairs, supported by a statement of the plans and projects of said department with respect thereto, and approved by the Governor, the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943 shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue any bonds authorized under this article in order to carry such plans and projects into execution, and, if so, the amount of bonds then to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out said plans and projects
 progressively, and it shall not be necessary that all the bonds herein authorized to be issued shall be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1167.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the June 6, 1972, election.)
-------------------------------------------

996.993.

While bonds authorized under this article are outstanding, the Secretary of Veterans Affairs shall cause to be made at the close of each fiscal year, a survey of the financial condition of the Division of Farm and Home Purchases, together with a projection of the division’s operations, that survey to be made by an independent public accountant of recognized standing. The results of the surveys and projections shall be set forth in written reports and the independent public accountant shall forward copies of the reports to the Secretary of Veterans Affairs, the members of the California Veterans Board, the appropriate policy committees dealing with veterans affairs in the Senate and the Assembly, and to the members of
 the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943. The Division of Farm and Home Purchases shall reimburse the independent public accountant for their services out of any funds that the division may have available on deposit with the Treasurer of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 84.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

996.994.

The committee may authorize the State Treasurer to sell all or any part of the bonds herein authorized at such time or times as may be fixed by the State Treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1167.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the June 6, 1972, election.)
-------------------------------------------

996.995.

Whenever bonds are sold, out of the first money realized from their sale, there shall be redeposited in the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund established by Section 16724.5 of the Government Code such sums as have been expended for the purposes specified in Section 16724.5 of the Government Code, which may be used for the same purpose and repaid in the same manner whenever additional sales are made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1167.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the June 6, 1972, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5l. Veterans Bond Act of 1974 [997.001. - 997.011.]

997.001.

This article may be cited as the Veterans Bond Act of 1974.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 7.   Approved in Proposition 3 at the June 4, 1974, election.)
-------------------------------------------

997.002.

The State General Obligation Bond Law, except as otherwise provided herein, is adopted for the purpose of the issuance, sale, and repayment of, and otherwise providing with respect to, the bonds authorized to be issued by this article, and the provisions of that law are included in this article as though set out in full in this article. All references in this article to “herein” shall be deemed to refer both to this article and such law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 7.   Approved in Proposition 3 at the June 4, 1974, election.)
-------------------------------------------

997.003.

As used in this article and for the purposes of this article as used in the State General Obligation Bond Law, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720), Part 3, Division 4, Title 2 of the Government Code, the following words shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Bond” means veterans bond, a state general obligation bond issued pursuant to this article adopting the provisions of the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(b) “Committee” means the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943, created by Section 991.

(c) “Board” means the Department of Veterans Affairs.

(d) “Fund” means the Veterans Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943 created by Section 988.

(e) “Bond Act” means this article authorizing the issuance of State General Obligation Bonds and adopting Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720), Part 3, Division 4, Title 2 of the Government Code by reference.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 7.   Approved in Proposition 3 at the June 4, 1974, election.)
-------------------------------------------

997.004.

For the purpose of creating a fund to provide farm and home aid for veterans in accordance with the provisions of the Veterans Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1943 and of all acts amendatory thereof and supplemental thereto, the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943, created by Section 991, shall be and hereby is authorized and empowered to create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California, in the aggregate amount of three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000), in the manner provided herein, but not otherwise,
 nor in excess thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 7.   Approved in Proposition 3 at the June 4, 1974, election.)
-------------------------------------------

997.005.

All bonds herein authorized, which shall have been duly sold and delivered as herein provided, shall constitute valid and legally binding general obligations of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest thereof.

There shall be collected annually in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected such a sum, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, as
 shall be required to pay the principal and interest on said bonds as herein provided, and it is hereby made the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collections of said revenue, to do and perform each and every act which shall be necessary to collect such additional sum.

On the several dates on which funds are remitted pursuant to Section 16676 of the Government Code for the payment of the then maturing principal and interest on the bonds in each fiscal year, there shall be returned into the General Fund in the State Treasury, all of the money in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943, not in excess of the principal of and interest on the said bonds then due and payable, except as hereinafter provided for the prior redemption of said bonds, and, in the event such money so returned on said remittance dates is less than said principal and interest then due and payable, then the balance remaining unpaid shall be returned into
 the General Fund in the State Treasury out of said Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943 as soon thereafter as it shall become available, together with interest thereon from such dates of maturity until so returned at the same rate as borne by said bonds, compounded semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 7.   Approved in Proposition 3 at the June 4, 1974, election.)
-------------------------------------------

997.006.

There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury for the purpose of this article, such an amount as will equal the following:

(a) Such sum annually as will be necessary to pay the principal of and the interest on the bonds issued and sold pursuant to the provisions of this article, as said principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) Such sum as is necessary to carry out the
 provisions of Section 997.007, which sum is appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 7.   Approved in Proposition 3 at the June 4, 1974, election.)
-------------------------------------------

997.007.

For the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this article the Director of Finance may by executive order authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this article. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the Veterans Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943. Any moneys made available under this article to the board shall be returned by the board to the General Fund from moneys received from the
 sale of bonds sold for the purpose of carrying out this article, together with interest at the rate of interest fixed in the bonds so sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 7.   Approved in Proposition 3 at the June 4, 1974, election.)
-------------------------------------------

997.008.

Upon request of the Department of Veterans Affairs, supported by a statement of the plans and projects of said department with respect thereto, and approved by the Governor, the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943 shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue any bonds authorized under this article in order to carry such plans and projects into execution, and, if so, the amount of bonds then to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out said plans and projects
 progressively, and it shall not be necessary that all the bonds herein authorized to be issued shall be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 7.   Approved in Proposition 3 at the June 4, 1974, election.)
-------------------------------------------

997.009.

While bonds authorized under this article are outstanding, the Secretary of Veterans Affairs shall cause to be made at the close of each fiscal year, a survey of the financial condition of the Division of Farm and Home Purchases, together with a projection of the division’s operations, that survey to be made by an independent public accountant of recognized standing. The results of the surveys and projections shall be set forth in written reports and the independent public accountant shall forward copies of the reports to the Secretary of Veterans Affairs, the members of the California Veterans Board, the appropriate policy committees dealing with veterans affairs in the Senate and the Assembly, and to the members of the
 Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943. The Division of Farm and Home Purchases shall reimburse the independent public accountant for their services out of any funds that the division may have available on deposit with the Treasurer of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 85.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

997.010.

The committee may authorize the State Treasurer to sell all or any part of the bonds herein authorized at such time or times as may be fixed by the State Treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 7.   Approved in Proposition 3 at the June 4, 1974, election.)
-------------------------------------------

997.011.

Whenever bonds are sold, out of the first money realized from their sale, there shall be redeposited in the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund established by Section 16724.5 of the Government Code such sums as have been expended for the purposes specified in Section 16724.5 of the Government Code, which may be used for the same purpose and repaid in the same manner whenever additional sales are made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 7.   Approved in Proposition 3 at the June 4, 1974, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5m. Veterans Bond Act of 1976 [998.001. - 998.011.]

998.001.

This article may be cited as the Veterans Bond Act of 1976.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 982.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 8, 1976, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.002.

The State General Obligation Bond Law, except as otherwise provided herein, is adopted for the purpose of the issuance, sale, and repayment of, and otherwise providing with respect to, the bonds authorized to be issued by this article, and the provisions of that law are included in this article as though set out in full in this article. All references in this article to “herein” shall be deemed to refer both to this article and such law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 982.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 8, 1976, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.003.

As used in this article and for the purposes of this article as used in the State General Obligation Bond Law, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720), Part 3, Division 4, Title 2 of the Government Code, the following words shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Bond” means veterans bond, a state general obligation bond issued pursuant to this article adopting the provisions of the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(b) “Committee” means the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943, created by Section 991.

(c) “Board” means the Department of Veterans Affairs.

(d) “Fund” means the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943 created by Section 988.

(e) “Bond Act” means this article authorizing the issuance of State General Obligation Bonds and adopting Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720), Part 3, Division 4, Title 2 of the Government Code by reference.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 982.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 8, 1976, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.004.

For the purpose of creating a fund to provide farm and home aid for veterans in accordance with the provisions of the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1974 and of all acts amendatory thereof and supplemental thereto, the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943, created by Section 991, shall be and hereby is authorized and empowered to create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California, in the aggregate amount of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000), in the manner provided herein, but not otherwise, nor
 in excess thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 982.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 8, 1976, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.005.

All bonds herein authorized, which shall have been duly sold and delivered as herein provided, shall constitute valid and legally binding general obligations of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest thereof.

There shall be collected annually in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected such a sum, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, as
 shall be required to pay the principal and interest on said bonds as herein provided, and it is hereby made the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collections of said revenue, to do and perform each and every act which shall be necessary to collect such additional sum.

On the several dates on which funds are remitted pursuant to Section 16676 of the Government Code for the payment of the then maturing principal and interest on the bonds in each fiscal year, there shall be returned into the General Fund in the State Treasury, all of the money in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943, not in excess of the principal of and interest on the said bonds then due and payable, except as hereinafter provided for the prior redemption of said bonds, and, in the event such money so returned on said remittance dates is less than said principal and interest then due and payable, then the balance remaining unpaid shall be returned into
 the General Fund in the State Treasury out of said Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943 as soon thereafter as it shall become available, together with interest thereon from such dates of maturity until so returned at the same rate as borne by said bonds, compounded semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 982.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 8, 1976, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.006.

There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury for the purpose of this article, such an amount as will equal the following:

(a) Such sum annually as will be necessary to pay the principal of and the interest on the bonds issued and sold pursuant to the provisions of this article, as said principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) Such sum as is necessary to carry out the
 provisions of Section 998.007, which sum is appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 982.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 8, 1976, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.007.

For the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this article the Director of Finance may by executive order authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this article. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943. Any moneys made available under this article to the board shall be returned by the board to the General Fund from moneys received from the
 sale of bonds sold for the purpose of carrying out this article, together with interest at the rate of interest fixed in the bonds so sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 982.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 8, 1976, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.008.

Upon request of the Department of Veterans Affairs, supported by a statement of the plans and projects of said department with respect thereto, and approved by the Governor, the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943 shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue any bonds authorized under this article in order to carry such plans and projects into execution, and, if so, the amount of bonds then to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out said plans and projects
 progressively, and it shall not be necessary that all the bonds herein authorized to be issued shall be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 982.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 8, 1976, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.009.

While bonds authorized under this article are outstanding, the Secretary of Veterans Affairs shall cause to be made at the close of each fiscal year, a survey of the financial condition of the Division of Farm and Home Purchases, together with a projection of the division’s operations, that survey to be made by an independent public accountant of recognized standing. The results of the surveys and projections shall be set forth in written reports and the independent public accountant shall forward copies of the reports to the Secretary of Veterans Affairs, the members of the California Veterans Board, the appropriate policy committees dealing with veterans affairs in the Senate and the Assembly, and to the members of
 the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943. The Division of Farm and Home Purchases shall reimburse the independent public accountant for their services out of any funds that the division may have available on deposit with the Treasurer of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 86.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

998.010.

The committee may authorize the State Treasurer to sell all or any part of the bonds herein authorized at such time or times as may be fixed by the State Treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 982.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 8, 1976, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.011.

Whenever bonds are sold, out of the first money realized from their sale, there shall be redeposited in the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund established by Section 16724.5 of the Government Code such sums as have been expended for the purposes specified in Section 16724.5 of the Government Code, which may be used for the same purpose and repaid in the same manner whenever additional sales are made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 982.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 8, 1976, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5n. Veterans Bond Act of 1978 [998.021. - 998.031.]

998.021.

This article may be cited as the Veterans Bond Act of 1978.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 215.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 7, 1978, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.022.

The State General Obligation Bond Law, except as otherwise provided herein, is adopted for the purpose of the issuance, sale, and repayment of, and otherwise providing with respect to, the bonds authorized to be issued by this article, and the provisions of that law are included in this article as though set out in full in this article. All references in this article to “herein” shall be deemed to refer both to this article and such law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 215.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 7, 1978, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.023.

As used in this article and for the purposes of this article as used in the State General Obligation Bond Law, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720), Part 3, Division 4, Title 2 of the Government Code, the following words shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Bond” means veterans bond, a state general obligation bond issued pursuant to this article adopting the provisions of the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(b) “Committee” means the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943, created by Section 991.

(c) “Board” means the Department of Veterans Affairs.

(d) “Fund” means the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943 created by Section 988.

(e) “Bond Act” means this article authorizing the issuance of state general obligation bonds and adopting Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720), Part 3, Division 4, Title 2 of the Government Code by reference.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 215.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 7, 1978, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.024.

For the purpose of creating a fund to provide farm and home aid for veterans in accordance with the provisions of the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1974 and of all acts amendatory thereof and supplemental thereto, the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943, created by Section 991, shall be and hereby is authorized and empowered to create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California, in the aggregate amount of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000), in the manner provided herein, but not otherwise, nor
 in excess thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 215.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 7, 1978, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.025.

All bonds herein authorized, which shall have been duly sold and delivered as herein provided, shall constitute valid and legally binding general obligations of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest thereof.

There shall be collected annually in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected such a sum, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, as
 shall be required to pay the principal and interest on such bonds as herein provided, and it is hereby made the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collections of such revenue, to do and perform each and every act which shall be necessary to collect such additional sum. 

On the several dates on which funds are remitted pursuant to Section 16676 of the Government Code for the payment of the then maturing principal and interest of the bonds in each fiscal year, there shall be returned into the General Fund in the State Treasury, all of the money in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943, not in excess of the principal of, and interest on, such bonds then due and payable, except as hereinafter provided for the prior redemption of such bonds, and, in the event such money so returned on said remittance dates is less than such principal and interest then due and payable, then the balance remaining unpaid shall be returned into the
 General Fund in the State Treasury out of the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943 as soon thereafter as it shall become available, together with interest thereon from such dates of maturity until so returned at the same rate as borne by such bonds, compounded semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 215.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 7, 1978, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.026.

There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury for the purpose of this article, such an amount as will equal the following:

(a) Such sum annually as will be necessary to pay the principal of, and the interest on, the bonds issued and sold pursuant to the provisions of this article, as such principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) Such sum as is necessary to carry out the
 provisions of Section 998.027, which sum is appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 215.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 7, 1978, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.027.

For the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this article, the Director of Finance may, by executive order, authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this article. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943. Any moneys made available under this article to the board shall be returned by the board to the General Fund from moneys received from
 the sale of bonds sold for the purpose of carrying out this article, together with interest at the rate of interest fixed in the bonds so sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 215.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 7, 1978, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.028.

Upon request of the Department of Veterans Affairs, supported by a statement of the plans and projects of such department with respect thereto, and approved by the Governor, the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943 shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue any bonds authorized under this article in order to carry such plans and projects into execution, and, if so, the amount of bonds then to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out said plans and projects
 progressively, and it shall not be necessary that all the bonds herein authorized to be issued shall be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 215.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 7, 1978, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.029.
